ko: 슬라이드 안전 기능: 핸드 그립; 높은 측면 벽; 미끄럼 방지 사다리/계단(통합형); 미끄럼 방지 표면; 솟아오른 측면 레일; 둥근 모서리; 자외선 차단 플라스틱; 마찰 감소용 방수 표면; 넓은 출구 구역; 기타
pl: Zabezpieczenia zjeżdżalni: Uchwyty na dłonie; Wysokie ściany boczne; Antypoślizgowa drabinka/stopnie (zintegrowane); Powierzchnia antypoślizgowa; Podniesione poręcze boczne; Zaokrąglone krawędzie; Plastik odporny na promieniowanie UV; Powierzchnia zmniejszająca tarcie (wodna); Szeroka strefa zjazdu; Inne
sl-SI: Varnostne lastnosti tobogana: Ročaji; Visoke stranske stene; Nedrseča lestev/stopnice (vgrajeno); Nedrseča površina; Dvignjene stranske ograje; Zaobljeni robovi; Plastika, odporna proti UV-žarkom; Površina, ki zmanjšuje trenje v vodi; Široko izhodno območje; Drugo
fi: Liukumäen turvaominaisuudet: Kädensijat; Korkeat sivuseinät; Liukumattomat tikkaat/askelmat (integroitu); Liukumaton pinta; Korotetut sivukaiteet; Pyöristetyt reunat; UV-säteilyä kestävä muovi; Kitkaa vähentävä vesipinta; Leveä poistumisalue; Muu
ru: Защитные особенности горки: Поручни; Высокие боковые стенки; Нескользящая лестница/ступени (встроенные); Нескользящая поверхность; Приподнятые боковые поручни; Закругленные края; Стойкий к УФ-излучению пластик; Поверхность с пониженным трением (водная); Широкая зона ската; Другое
lt-LT: Čiuožyklos saugos ypatybės: Rankenos; Aukštos šoninės sienelės; Neslystančios kopėčios / pakopos (integruotos); Neslystantis paviršius; Paaukštinti šoniniai turėklai; Užapvalinti kraštai; UV spinduliams atsparus plastikas; Trintį mažinantis drėkinamas paviršius; Plati nusileidimo zona; Kita
sv: Säkerhetsfunktioner för slide: Handtag; Höga sidoväggar; Halkfri stege/steg (integrerade); Halkfri yta; Upphöjda sidokanter; Rundade kanter; UV-beständig plast; Vattenreducerande friktionsyta; Bred avslutningszon; Övrigt
en: Slide safety features: Hand grips; High side walls; Non-slip ladder/steps (integrated); Non-slip surface; Raised side rails; Rounded edges; UV-resistant plastic; Water-reducing friction surface; Wide exit zone; Other
pt-BR: Escorregador recursos de segurança: Alças; Paredes laterais altas; Escada/degraus antiderrapantes (integrados); Superfície antiderrapante; Trilhos laterais elevados; Bordas arredondadas; Plástico resistente a raios UV; Superfície de redução de atrito com a água; Área de saída ampla; Outro
de: Sicherheitsmerkmale der Rutsche: Handgriffe; Hohe Seitenwände; Rutschfeste Leiter/Stufen (integriert); Rutschfeste Oberfläche; Erhöhte Seitenschienen; Abgerundete Kanten; UV-beständiger Kunststoff; Reibungsmindernde Wasseroberfläche; Breiter Ausstiegsbereich; Andere
cs: Bezpečnostní prvky pro skluzavky: Držadla; Vysoké bočnice; Protiskluzový žebřík/schůdky (integrované); Protiskluzový povrch; Zvýšené boční zábradlí; Zaoblené hrany; Plast odolný vůči UV záření; Povrch snižující tření pomocí vody; Široká dojezdová zóna; Jiné
sk-SK: Bezpečnostné prvky slidu: Rukoväti; Vysoké bočné steny; Protišmykový rebrík/schody (integrované); Protišmykový povrch; Zvýšené bočné zábradlia; Zaoblené hrany; Plast odolný proti UV žiareniu; Povrch znižujúci trenie vodou; Široká zóna výjazdu; Iné
zh-CN: 滑梯安全特性: 把手; 高侧壁; 防滑梯/踏步（集成式）; 防滑表面; 加高侧扶手; 圆滑边缘; 抗 UV 塑料; 减摩阻水表面; 宽敞的出口区域; 其他
fr: Éléments de sécurité du toboggan: Poignées; Parois latérales hautes; Échelle/marches antidérapantes (intégrées); Surface antidérapante; Rampes latérales surélevées; Bords arrondis; Plastique résistant aux UV; Surface réduisant la friction avec l'eau; Large zone de sortie; Autre
da: Sikkerhedsfunktioner for rutsjebane: Håndgreb; Høje sidevægge; Skridsikker stige/trin (integreret); Skridsikker overflade; Forhøjede sideskinner; Afrundede kanter; UV-resistent plast; Vandreducerende friktionsoverflade; Bred udgangszone; Andet
hr-HR: Sigurnosne značajke klizanja: Rukohvati; Visoke bočne stijenke; Neklizajuće ljestve / stepenice (integrirano); Neklizajuća površina; Uzdignute bočne ograde; Zaobljeni rubovi; Plastika otporna na UV zračenje; Površina za smanjenje trenja pomoću vode; Široka izlazna zona; Ostalo
th: คุณสมบัติความปลอดภัยของสไลด์: ที่จับ; ขอบผนังสูง; บันได/ขั้นบันไดกันลื่น (ในตัว); พื้นผิวกันลื่น; ราวจับด้านข้างแบบยกสูง; ขอบมน; พลาสติกทนรังสี UV; พื้นผิวลดแรงเสียดทานด้วยน้ำ; พื้นที่ทางออกกว้าง; อื่นๆ
ja: 滑り台の安全機能: ハンドグリップ; 高いサイドウォール; 滑り止め付きはしご/ステップ (一体型); 滑り止め加工表面; 隆起したサイドレール; 丸みを帯びたエッジ; UV耐性プラスチック; 摩擦低減ウォーター表面; ワイドエグジットゾーン; その他
ro-RO: Caracteristici de siguranță pentru culisă: Mânere; Pereți laterali înalți; Scară/trepte antiderapante (integrate); Suprafață antiderapantă; Șine laterale înălțate; Margini rotunjite; Plastic rezistent la raze UV; Suprafață care reduce frecarea cu apă; Zonă largă de ieșire; Altele
tr: Kaydırak güvenlik özellikleri: El tutamakları; Yüksek yan duvarlar; Kaymaz merdiven/basamaklar (entegre); Kaymaz yüzey; Yükseltilmiş yan korkuluklar; Yuvarlatılmış kenarlar; UV ışınlarına dayanıklı plastik; Suyla sürtünmeyi azaltan yüzey; Geniş çıkış alanı; Diğer
hu: Csúszda biztonsági jellemzői: Kapaszkodók; Magas oldalfalak; Csúszásmentes létra/lépcső (beépített); Csúszásmentes felület; Magasított oldalsó korlátok; Lekerekített élek; UV-álló műanyag; Súrlódáscsökkentő vizes felület; Széles kilépőzóna; Egyéb
bg-BG: Функции за безопасност на пързалката: Дръжки; Високи странични стени; Нехлъзгаща се стълба/стъпала (вградени); Нехлъзгаща се повърхност; Повдигнати странични парапети; Заоблени ръбове; Пластмаса, устойчива на UV лъчи; Повърхност, намаляваща триенето с вода; Широка зона за излизане; Други
vi: Các tính năng an toàn của cầu trượt: Tay vịn; Thành cao; Thang/bậc thang chống trượt (tích hợp); Bề mặt chống trượt; Thanh vịn hai bên nhô cao; Cạnh bo tròn; Nhựa chống tia UV; Bề mặt giảm ma sát nhờ nước; Khu vực lối ra rộng rãi; Khác
nb: Sikkerhetsfunksjoner for sklie: Håndtak; Høye sidevegger; Sklisikker stige/trinn (integrert); Sklisikker overflate; Forhøyede sideskinner; Avrundede kanter; UV-bestandig plast; Vannreduserende friksjonsoverflate; Bred utgangssone; Annet
es: Características de seguridad del tobogán: Asideros; Paredes laterales altas; Escalera/escalones antideslizantes (integrados); Superficie antideslizante; Rieles laterales elevados; Bordes redondeados; Plástico resistente a los rayos UV; Superficie de fricción que reduce el agua; Zona de salida amplia; Otro
pt-PT: Características de segurança da corrediça: Pegas manuais; Paredes laterais altas; Escada/degraus antiderrapantes (integrados); Superfície antiderrapante; Guardas laterais elevadas; Bordos arredondados; Plástico resistente a raios UV; Superfície com fricção reduzida por água; Zona de saída ampla; Outro
nl: Glijbaan veiligheidskenmerken: Handgrepen; Hoge zijwanden; Antislip-ladder/treden (geïntegreerd); Antislip-oppervlak; Verhoogde zijrails; Afgeronde randen; Uv-bestendig plastic; Wrijvingsverlagend wateroppervlak; Brede uitstapzone; Overig
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ασφαλείας τσουλήθρας: Λαβές χεριών; Ψηλά πλευρικά τοιχώματα; Αντιολισθητική σκάλα/σκαλοπάτια (ενσωματωμένα); Αντιολισθητική επιφάνεια; Υπερυψωμένα πλαϊνά προστατευτικά; Στρογγυλεμένες άκρες; Πλαστικό ανθεκτικό στην UV ακτινοβολία; Επιφάνεια μείωσης τριβής με νερό; Φαρδιά ζώνη εξόδου; Άλλο
it: Dispositivi di sicurezza dello scivolo: Maniglie di presa; Pareti laterali alte; Scala/gradini antiscivolo (integrati); Superficie antiscivolo; Sponde laterali rialzate; Bordi arrotondati; Plastica resistente ai raggi UV; Superficie per la riduzione dell'attrito in acqua; Zona di uscita ampia; Altro
zh-TW: 滑梯安全功能: 扶手; 加高側牆; 防滑爬梯/台階 (整合式); 防滑表面; 加高側軌; 圓角邊緣; 抗 UV 塑膠; 水分減摩表面; 寬闊出口區; 其他